Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3803
Commission; funds; executive director; qualifications; office.

The commission may receive and administer funds from state, federal, and other sources and may employ and fix the compensation of an executive director of its own choosing who shall be an Asian American person and a legal resident of the State of Nebraska. An office for the executive director shall be provided.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 30.